Tennessee statutes. Title 38 Prevention And Detection Of Crime
Part 2

Scrap Jewelry and Metal Dealers

38-1-201. Registration — Applicability of part.

Any person, firm, or corporation purchasing or otherwise dealing in antique, used or scrap jewelry and precious metals, where the purchase is for resale in its original form or as changed by remounting, melting, reforming, remolding or recasting or for resale as scrap or in bulk, shall be required to register with the chief of police and sheriff of each city and county in which the activity is carried on.

This part shall not be applicable to:

Any person, firm or corporation purchasing or otherwise dealing solely in coins or recyclable aluminum cans; or

Any transaction between dealers, when the selling dealer has previously complied with the requirements set out in §§ 38-1-202 and 38-1-203 relative to the items sold pursuant to the transaction.

Business activities regulated under this part shall be subject to the Business Tax Act, compiled in title 67, chapter 4, part 7.

Acts 1980, ch. 766, §§ 1, 5; T.C.A., § 38-606; Acts 2009, ch. 179, § 1; 2009, ch. 282, § 5.

Cross-References. Consumer protection, title 47, chapter 18.

Pawnbrokers, title 45, ch. 6, part 2.

Attorney General Opinions. A person who buys gold or other precious metals in the form of used jewelry is not regulated by T.C.A. §§ 62-9-101—62-9-113 but rather is governed by T.C.A. §§ 38-1-201—38-1-205. Buyers and dealers of scrap jewelry and precious metals must register with the chief of police and sheriff of each county in which they conduct such activity pursuant to T.C.A. § 38-1-201(a). OAG 12-98, 2012 Tenn. AG LEXIS 103 (10/29/12).

Pawnbroker compliance with scrap jewelry and metal dealers act. OAG 12-101, 2012 Tenn. AG LEXIS 102 (10/31/12).

38-1-202. Holding period before transfer or alteration of purchased items.

It is unlawful for any person or corporation engaging in the activity described in § 38-1-201 to sell, exchange, barter or remove from the place in which such business is conducted, or to change the form of any such items by remounting, melting, cutting up, or otherwise changing the form of any such items for a period of twenty (20) days from the date of purchase; provided, however, that the person or corporation may remove the items for the purpose of holding the items in a secure location, including a storage facility or bank vault, for the required twenty-day period. This section does not apply to persons or corporations engaged in the reclamation of precious metals through the reprocessing of used film or other similar materials that in their original form contain precious metals but were not intended to be items of jewelry, or become antiques or be marketed exclusively for the precious metals contained in the materials.

No person acting as a buyer or dealer under this section shall purchase any item covered by this section from a person under eighteen (18) years of age, nor accept any item covered by this section from anyone who appears intoxicated, nor from any person known to the person to be a thief, or to have been convicted of larceny, burglary or robbery, without first notifying a police officer. Any person acting as a buyer or dealer under this section shall exercise due care to comply with this section.

No person acting as a buyer or dealer under this section shall take any item covered by this section under a buy-sell agreement, when the article is known to the person to be stolen.

Acts 1980, ch. 766, § 2; 1981, ch. 424, §§ 1, 2; T.C.A., § 38-607; Acts 1985, ch. 311, § 1; 1992, ch. 943, § 1; 2009, ch. 282, § 1; 2012, ch. 675, § 1; 2014, ch. 632, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. The offense in this section may have been affected by the Criminal Sentencing Reform Act of 1989. See §§ 39-11-114, 40-35-110, 40-35-111.

Amendments. The 2014 amendment added the proviso to the first sentence of (a).

Effective Dates. Acts 2014, ch. 632, § 2. April 4, 2014.

Attorney General Opinions. Holding period location requirements of scrap jewelry and metal dealer's act of 1980. OAG 11-69, 2011 Tenn. AG LEXIS 71 (9/15/2011).

Pawnbroker compliance with scrap jewelry and metal dealers act. OAG 12-101, 2012 Tenn. AG LEXIS 102 (10/31/12).

38-1-203. Records of transactions.

Every person or corporation dealing in the items described in § 38-1-201 shall keep a log in duplicate and shall enter on the log:

A clear and accurate description of any items of jewelry or precious metals purchased, including, if applicable:

Brand name;

Model number;

Serial number, if issued by the manufacturer and not intentionally defaced, altered or removed;

Size;

Color, as apparent to the untrained eye, not applicable to diamonds;

Precious metal type, content and weight, if indicated;

Gemstone description, including the number of stones; and

Any other unique identifying marks, numbers, names or letters;

Information on the seller, including: name, race, sex, height, weight, date of birth, residence address and numbers from the items used as identification. Acceptable items of identification are one (1) of the following documents:

A state-issued driver license;

A state-issued identification card;

A passport;

A valid military identification;

A nonresident alien border crossing card;

A resident alien border crossing card; or

A United States immigration and naturalization service identification; and

The date and amount of money paid for the items.

The seller and the purchaser shall sign the log below the description of each transaction.

On each day the purchaser shall transact business of the type described within this section, the purchaser shall deliver to the sheriff and the chief of police of each county or municipality in which the business is conducted a copy of the log concerning that day's business; and the copy of the log shall be delivered by twelve o'clock (12:00) noon of the day following the date of the transaction. The book shall be carefully preserved without alteration and shall at all times be open to the inspection of the sheriff of the county and the chief of police or any deputy or police officer of the city or county.

Acts 1980, ch. 766, § 3; T.C.A., § 38-608; Acts 2009, ch. 282, § 2.

Cross-References. Record of transactions required of pawnbrokers, § 45-6-209.

Textbooks. Tennessee Criminal Practice and Procedure (Raybin), § 18.291.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 22 Tenn. Juris., Searches and Seizures, § 11.

38-1-204. Penalties.

A violation of this part is a Class A misdemeanor.

Acts 1980, ch. 766, § 4; T.C.A., § 38-609; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113; 2009, ch. 282, § 4.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class A misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

Sentencing for misdemeanors, § 40-35-302.

38-1-205. Buyer or dealer obtaining and recording information from seller to be made available to law enforcement — Recovery of property by party asserting ownership by making report to law enforcement following report of theft.

When any person sells property to a buyer or dealer subject to § 38-1-201, the buyer or dealer shall obtain and record the information provided for in § 38-1-203 and obtain a statement of the seller that the seller is the lawful owner of the item, and shall have the record signed by the seller. This record shall be made available to any law enforcement agency or officer upon request.

The party asserting ownership of any property that the party alleges is stolen and that is in the possession of a buyer or dealer subject to § 38-1-201 may recover the property by making a report to any law enforcement agency in the county or municipality in which the property is located and providing the law enforcement agency with proof of ownership of the property; provided, that a report of the theft of the property was made to the proper authorities within twenty (20) days after obtaining knowledge of the theft or loss; and provided, further, that the party asserting ownership will assist in the prosecution of the seller of the item. Upon the receipt of proof of ownership, an officer of a law enforcement agency in the county or municipality in which the property is located shall recover the property from the buyer or dealer, without expense to the rightful owner of the property, unless the buyer or dealer presents evidence of having received proof of ownership of the property by the seller. Any property recovered from a buyer or dealer subject to § 38-1-201 shall be returned to the rightful owner of the property, subject to evidence in any criminal proceeding.

In the event that the party asserting ownership of the property has provided a timely report of the theft or loss of the property, and the buyer or dealer presents acceptable evidence to the law enforcement agency of having received proper proof of ownership from the seller of the property, then and only then shall the law enforcement agency have satisfied its processes, duties and responsibilities. It shall then inform the party alleging ownership that it will be necessary for that person to commence an appropriate civil action for the return of the property within thirty (30) days of receiving the notice. If the buyer or dealer is ordered to return the property pursuant to such civil action, then the court shall also order that the buyer or dealer pay all litigation costs and reasonable attorneys' fees. The buyer or dealer shall not be required to surrender the property to any law enforcement officer or agency or any other person absent an appropriate warrant.

If for any reason after the local authorities have seized certain property and are unable to locate the rightful owner of the property after due diligence, then the property may be returned to the buyer or dealer upon the buyer or dealer executing a hold-harmless agreement to the local authorities pursuant to title 40, chapter 33.

Acts 2009, ch. 282, § 3; 2011, ch. 225, §§ 1-5; 2012, ch. 675, § 2.